Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 1 General Provisions

5-5-1.
Power of probate, superior, state, juvenile, State-wide Business, and City of Atlanta courts.

The superior, state, and juvenile courts, the Georgia State-wide Business Court, and the City Court of Atlanta shall have power to correct errors and grant new trials in cases or collateral issues in any of the respective courts in such manner and under such rules as they may establish according to law and the usages and customs of courts.

Probate courts shall have power to correct errors and grant new trials in civil cases provided for by Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15 under such rules and procedures as apply to the superior courts.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 503; Code 1863, § 3636; Code 1868, § 3661; Code 1873, § 3712; Code 1882, § 3712; Civil Code 1895, § 5474; Civil Code 1910, § 6079; Code 1933, § 70-102; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 2-1/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “, the Georgia State-wide Business Court,” near the beginning of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

For survey of 1995 Eleventh Circuit cases on trial practice and procedure, see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 907 (1996).

For annual survey article, “ ‘Garbage In, Garbage Out’: The Litigation Implosion Over the Unconstitutional Organization and Jurisdiction of the City Court of Atlanta,” see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 49 (2000).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).